New Jersey, session 222, S3662.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this act: First responder means a law enforcement officer, a paramedic or other emergency medical responder, or a firefighter, whether working on a paid or volunteer basis, who provides emergency response services during a pandemic. Health care professional means a physician, nurse, physicians assistant, certified nurse aide, homemaker-home health aide, personal care assistant, or any other health care practitioner licensed or certified pursuant to Title 45 of the Revised Statutes, and any properly authorized resident or intern, who provides health care services during a pandemic. Other frontline worker means an individual, other than a first responder or health care professional, who provides an essential service or a key public service during a pandemic. Pandemic means the coronavirus-19 (COVID-19) pandemic, declared by the World Health Organization in March 2020, and any other pandemic of disease declared in the future. Pandemic PTSD means post-traumatic stress disorder that is suffered by first responders, health care professionals, and other frontline workers due to their provision of health care services, emergency medical services, emergency response or transport services, or other essential or key public services during a pandemic. Post-traumatic stress disorder or PTSD means a debilitating mental health condition that is triggered by a terrifying, traumatic, or catastrophic event, is not controllable through normal methods of self-care, and includes such symptoms as flashbacks, nightmares, and severe anxiety, as well as the inability to control ones thoughts about the triggering event. b.    There is established, in the Department of Human Services, a Pandemic PTSD Task Force.  The purpose of the task force shall be to evaluate the prevalence and likelihood of, and develop best practices for the identification and treatment of, pandemic PTSD in first responders, health care professionals, and other frontline workers in the State, and recommend the implementation and use of appropriate treatments and supports to mitigate, eliminate, and otherwise reduce the effects of pandemic PTSD on these workers. c.     The task force shall consist of 21 members, including: (1)   five members, or their designees, who shall serve ex officio as follows:  the Director of the Office of Employee and Organization Development in the Department of Law and Public Safety, who shall serve as co-chair of the task force; the Assistant Commissioner of the Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services in the Department of Human Services, who shall serve as co-chair of the task force; the Commissioner of Health; the New Jersey Secretary of State; and the State Attorney General; (2)   four public members to be appointed by the Senate President, as follows:  (a) one licensed psychiatrist who has expertise in the treatment of PTSD in first responders, health care professionals, or other frontline workers, particularly during or following the occurrence of public disasters or other crisis-level incidents; (b) one licensed health care professional who has expertise in the treatment of the physical side-effects of, or illnesses or injuries contributing to, PTSD; (c) one law enforcement officer who has personal experience with PTSD; and (d) one non-volunteer emergency medical responder who has personal experience with PTSD; (3)   four public members to be appointed by the Senate Minority Leader, as follows:  (a) one licensed psychiatrist or other mental health care professional who has expertise in the treatment of PTSD in first responders, health care professionals, or other frontline workers, particularly during or following the occurrence of public disasters or other crisis-level incidents; (b) one licensed health care professional who has expertise in the treatment of the physical side-effects of, or illnesses or injuries contributing to, PTSD; (c) one law enforcement officer who has personal experience with PTSD; and (d) one emergency medical responder who is a member of a volunteer first aid, ambulance or rescue squad and has personal experience with PTSD; (4)   four public members to be appointed by the Speaker of the General Assembly, as follows:  (a) one representative of a nonprofit organization that provides community-based mental health or related services to persons suffering from PTSD in the State; (b) one licensed health care professional who has personal experience with PTSD; (c) one firefighter who is a member of a volunteer fire company and has personal experience with PTSD; and (d) one frontline worker who has personal experience with PTSD; and (5)   four public members to be appointed by the Minority Leader of the General Assembly, as follows:  (a) one citizen who is trained and qualified to serve as a para-professional crisis counselor in the State; (b) one licensed health care professional who has personal experience with PTSD; (c) one non-volunteer firefighter who has personal experience with PTSD; and (d) one frontline worker who has personal experience with PTSD. d.    The members of the task force shall serve until the task force submits its report pursuant to subsection j. of this section.  Vacancies in the councils membership shall be filled in the same manner provided for the original appointments. e.     The task force shall organize as soon as practicable, but not more than 30 days, after the appointment of a majority of its members and shall meet at the times and places designated by its co-chairs.  The task force may conduct business without a quorum, but may only vote on a recommendation when a quorum is present. f.     Members of the task force shall serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed for travel and other miscellaneous expenses incurred in the necessary performance of their duties, within the limits of funds made available to the council for its purposes. g.    The task force shall be entitled to receive assistance and services from any State, county, or municipal department, board, commission, or agency as it may require and as may be available to it for its purposes.  The task force shall further be authorized to consult with any association, organization, or individual having knowledge of the causes or effects of PTSD or experience with the identification or treatment of PTSD.  The Department of Human Services shall provide staff and administrative support as may be necessary to assist the task force in carrying out its duties. h.    The task force may solicit, receive, and expend any grant moneys or other funds that may be made available, for the task forces purposes, by any government agency or any private for-profit or not-for-profit organization or entity. i.     The task force shall have the duty to: (1)   identify and evaluate the causes of, the factors that contribute to, and the mental and physical effects of, pandemic PTSD in first responders, health care professionals, and other frontline workers; (2)   estimate the current prevalence of pandemic PTSD among first responders, health care professionals, and other frontline workers, as well as the likelihood of future cases; (3)   develop best practices for the identification and treatment of pandemic PTSD in first responders, health care professionals, and other frontline workers; (4)   identify and approve new, alternative, and innovative means and methods of diagnosing and treating pandemic PTSD in first responders, health care professionals, and other frontline workers; and (5)   identify policies, practices, services, resources, and funding sources that can be used to:  (a) enhance the ability of health care and mental health care professionals to identify, diagnose the severity of, and appropriately treat, pandemic PTSD and its side effects; (b) facilitate the Statewide implementation and use of the best practices and diagnostic and treatment methods identified by the task force pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (4) of this subsection; (c) enhance the ability of employers to identify and provide appropriate assistance to employees who may be suffering from pandemic PTSD; (d) facilitate the cooperative and integrated provision of physical and behavioral health care in association with the treatment of pandemic PTSD and associated injuries, illnesses, or side effects in first responders, health care professionals, and other frontline workers; (e) increase the type and availability of community supports that are available to assist first responders, health care professionals, and other frontline workers in successfully coping with and overcoming pandemic PTSD; (f) increase public awareness of pandemic PTSD occurring among first responders, health care professionals, and other frontline workers; (g) improve the accessibility of care and treatment for pandemic PTSD; (h) enhance the ability of first responders, health care professionals, other frontline workers, and their families to recognize symptoms of pandemic PTSD, identify the need for treatment, and seek out appropriate treatment when needed; (i) remove any professional or other stigma associated with the receipt of treatment for pandemic PTSD; and (j) otherwise enable the State to promptly address and mitigate the effects of pandemic PTSD on first responders, health care professionals, and other frontline workers. j.     Not later than 12 months after its organizational meeting pursuant to subsection e. of this section, the task force shall prepare and submit a written report to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature, providing its findings and recommendations with respect to the issues under its purview.  A copy of the report submitted pursuant to this section shall be posted on the Internet websites of the Departments of Law and Public Safety, Human Services, and Health.  The report prepared pursuant to this subsection shall: (1)   describe the task forces findings on the matters described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection i. of this section; (2)   identify the best practices that have been developed and the new, alternative, and innovative diagnostic and treatment methods that have been approved by the task force pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (4) of subsection i. of this section, and provide data and other appropriate evidence to support the adoption of each best practice and the approval of each diagnostic and treatment method; and (3)   provide recommendations for legislative, executive, or other actions that can be undertaken to effectuate the goals described in paragraph (5) of subsection i. of this section. k.    The task force shall dissolve on the 30th day following the submission of its report pursuant to subsection b. of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire on the 30th day following the submission of a task force report to the Governor and Legislature pursuant to subsection j. of section 1 of this act.